Louisiana, session 2026, HB689.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:109 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§109. Public assistance benefits; change in household; reporting; fraud
A. For the purpose of assisting the Louisiana Department of Health in
identifying changes in household circumstances for benefit allotments, the
Department of Children and Family Services shall report identifying information to
the Louisiana Department of Health within three business days of a child being
placed in the custody of the Department of Children and Family Services. The
Louisiana Department of Health shall determine the required information necessary
to identify the child and the child's household.
B. Upon receipt of a report from the Department of Children and Family
Services pursuant to Subsection A or C of this Section, the Louisiana Department of
Health shall immediately:
(1) Review whether either of the child's parents is receiving any public
assistance benefits as a result of the child being included in the parent's household.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-904 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 689
(2) Adjust any Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, WIC, or FITAP
benefits for the parent's household to reflect the change in circumstance.
(3) If the child is enrolled in Medicaid, issue a new Medicaid managed care
insurance card for the child at the child's new residence.
C. If the child has not reached the age of eighteen at the time the child is
returned to the custody of the child's parent, the Department of Children and Family
Services shall report to the Louisiana Department of Health within three business
days of the child being returned to the custody of the child's parent.
D. If the Louisiana Department of Health receives an application for a public
assistance benefit for a child that is included in another household that receives
benefits, the department shall conduct an assessment to determine where the child
is currently residing and adjust the benefit allotment accordingly.